Utah statutes.
65A-1-3.   Forestry, Fire, and State Lands Advisory Council -- Membership -- Chair -- Terms -- Quorum -- Per diem and travel expenses -- Duties.

(1) (a)  The Forestry, Fire, and State Lands Advisory Council shall be composed of 12 members as follows:

(i)  one representative from Rich County;

(ii)  one representative from Utah County;

(iii)  four individuals representing the combination of Box Elder, Davis, Salt Lake, Tooele, and Weber counties, two of whom shall be representatives of industries concerned with sovereign lands;

(iv)  one individual representing the combination of Cache, Emery, Garfield, Grand, Kane, San Juan, and Uintah counties;

(v)  four individuals representing the state at large, one of whom shall be representative of environmental concerns and one of whom shall be representative of sporting concerns; and

(vi)  the director of the division.

(b)  The director of the division:

(i)  shall serve as chair; and

(ii)  may not vote except as may be necessary to break a tie vote.

(2) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (2)(b), as terms of current council members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of council members are staggered so that approximately half of the council is appointed every two years.

(3)  Seven members of the council constitute a quorum.

(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(5)  Meetings may be called by the chair or by a quorum of the council.

(6)  The council shall meet not less than every six months.

(7)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(8) (a)  The council shall consider public comment and concern in formulating advice and counsel for the division.

(b)  Council meetings shall be widely advertised, with affected state agencies and public and private interests being directly notified of meeting schedules and agendas.

(9) (a)  The council may provide written recommendations to the director.

(b)  The director shall provide a written explanation of any written council recommendation the director chooses to disregard.

